Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.230

Bylaws of association—Terms of directors—Staggering.

The bylaws may provide that directors shall be elected for terms of from one to five years: PROVIDED, That at each annual election the same fraction of the total number of directors shall be elected as one year bears to the number of years of the term of office.

[ 1959 c 312 s 23.]